Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska90-536
Department of Correctional Services;
Operations.

AGENCY NO. 46 — DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONAL SERVICES

Program No. 200 - Operations

FY2011-12
FY2012-13

GENERAL FUND
156,031,016
159,445,668

CASH FUND
1,741,500
1,741,500

FEDERAL FUND est.
1,732,408
1,719,187

REVOLVING FUND est.
18,229,738
18,192,892

PROGRAM TOTAL
177,734,662
181,099,247

SALARY LIMIT
89,564,114
91,383,014

The unexpended General Fund and Cash Fund appropriation balances existing
on June 30, 2011, are hereby reappropriated.

Included in the salary limitations provided by this section is $3,441,193
for FY2011-12 and $3,441,193 for FY2012-13 for Revolving Fund salaries for
program classifications 390 and 563, that shall not be limited to the amounts
shown.

The Department of Administrative Services shall monitor the appropriations
and expenditures for this program according to the following program classifications:

No. 260 - Nebraska Correctional Youth Facility

No. 300 - Tecumseh Correctional Center

No. 368 - Lincoln Community Corrections Center

No. 369 - Omaha Community Corrections Center

No. 370 - Central Office

No. 372 - Nebraska State Penitentiary

No. 373 - Nebraska Center for Women - York

No. 375 - Diagnostic and Evaluation Center

No. 376 - Lincoln Correctional Center

No. 377 - Omaha Correctional Center

No. 386 - McCook Incarceration Work Camp

No. 389 - Adult Parole Administration

No. 390 - Federal Surplus Property

No. 495 - Department Central Warehouse

No. 563 - Correctional Industries

Revolving Fund expenditures shall not be limited to the amounts shown.

It is intended that the Department of Correctional Services shall maintain
a Department Contingency Fund and a Department Equipment Fund.

Laws 2012, LB599A, § 3;

Laws 2012, LB793A, § 1;

Laws 2013, LB194, § 187.